Hawaii statutes.
§287-8 Further exceptions to requirement of
security. The requirements as to security and suspension of sections 287-5
and 287-6 shall not apply:

(1) To the driver or the registered owner of a motor
vehicle involved in an accident where no injury or damage was caused to the
person or property of anyone other than the driver or registered owner;

(2) To the driver or the registered owner of the
motor vehicle legally parked at the time of accident;

(3) To the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an
accident during the normal scope of that person's employment;

(4) To the registered owner of the motor vehicle if
at the time of the accident the vehicle was being operated without the
registered owner's permission, express or implied, or was parked by a person
who had been operating the motor vehicle without such permission; nor

(5) If prior to the date the administrator would
otherwise suspend the license or permit under section 287-6, there is filed
with the administrator evidence satisfactory to the administrator that the
driver who would otherwise have to file security has been released from
liability or been finally adjudicated not to be liable or has executed a duly
acknowledged written agreement providing for the payment of an agreed amount in
installments, with respect to all claims for injuries or damages resulting from
the accident. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-87; HRS §287-8; am L
1970, c 164, §3; am L 1980, c 84, pt of §1; am L 1984, c 110, §1; gen ch 1985;
am L 2002, c 47, §1]

Case Notes

Intended to require irresponsible operators to furnish
alternative proofs of financial responsibility. 40 H. 213.

Uninsured motorist coverage. 62 H. 424, 616 P.2d 1357.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next